Hawaii statutes.
§502-17 Filing of; data on plans;
monuments; metes and bounds descriptions. (a) The registrar shall accept
and file in the registrar's office, upon the payment of the fee as provided in
section 502-25, any plan of land prepared in the manner prescribed by this
section. Every such plan shall contain a short name of the tract; the name of
the ahupuaa or ili, district, and island; such data concerning the original
title of the land as may be known, together with the name of the last owner of
record and the owner's address; the signature of the surveyor and the
surveyor's address; the signature of the maker and the maker's address; date of
survey, scale, the meridian line, area, the true azimuths and lengths of
principal lines; and the names of all known adjoining owners. One or more
durable monuments shall be placed on the land which shall connect with the
government triangulation system and which monuments shall be placed as
indicated on the plan. Whenever the land platted is made up of more than one original
title, it shall be necessary to show all original title lines in broken lines
as follows:

........................................

(b) The plan shall first be referred to the
department of accounting and general services of the State which shall cause
the same to be checked as to form and mathematical correctness but not on the
ground. If the plan is drawn in accordance with this section and sections
502-18 and 502-19, the department shall indorse its approval of the plan on the
face thereof, after which the plan may be filed of record. The department
shall withhold approval of any plan until satisfied that the surveyor and maker
of the plan is a registered professional surveyor.

(c) Plans for the subdivision of land situated
in any county shall, before approval by the department, be subject to approval
by the appropriate officer, agency, or agencies in like manner as subdivisions
under applicable laws.

(d) On receipt for recordation of a transfer
or separate description document concerning a lot in a subdivision, the
registrar shall accept and file the document with:

(1) A metes and bounds description, either solely or
as part of the document;

(2) A county certified plat map; and

(3) A letter from a registered professional surveyor,
certifying that the metes and bounds description conforms to the accompanying
plat map.

The document shall otherwise comply with the
requirements for recordation under this section. Any parcel created or
subdivided prior to the effective date of the subdivision laws of the
respective counties are exempt from the provisions of this subsection.

(e) For checking the survey and plan as to
form and mathematical correctness, the department shall charge $2 an hour and
shall require the owner of the land to deposit the estimated cost thereof
before making such check.

(f) All fees collected under this section,
except as provided under sections 501-23.5 and 502-25 for the bureau of
conveyances special fund, shall be deposited in the state treasury to the
credit of the general fund. [L 1905, c 23, §1; am L 1913, c 82, §1; am L 1915,
c 68, §1; RL 1925, §3134; am L 1931, c 63, §2; am L 1932 2d, c 31, §1; am L
1933, c 24, §1; RL 1935, §5120; am L 1939, c 242, pt of §11; RL 1945, §12720;
am L 1949, c 222, §14; am L 1951, c 271, §4; RL 1955, §343-11; am L 1957, c
316, §25; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §12; am L 1963, c 123, §1; HRS §502-17; gen ch
1985; am L 1987, c 303, §1; am L 1988, c 141, §56; am L 2001, c 130, §2]

Cross References

Functions of surveyor undertaken by the department of
accounting and general services, see §26-6.

Modification of fees, see §92-28.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next